Louisiana, session 2026, SB404.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 22:997 is hereby amended and reenacted and Part XIII of Chapter 5
of Title 22 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950, comprised of R.S. 22:1809.1 through
1809.16, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§997. Visual services, choice of practitioners
A. Whenever any medical eye care or vision care benefits are provided by or
available through a health benefit plan, health maintenance organization, preferred
provider organization, managed care organization, accountable care organization,
vision benefit plan, vision benefit discount plan, or other plan or contract of
Page 1 of 33
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 404 ENROLLED
insurance or any medical hospital service contract that are within the lawful scope
of practice of a duly licensed optometrist as defined in R.S. 37:1041(C), there shall
be no discrimination in the amount of either:
(1) Medical eye care or vision care benefits available to an insured,
participant, enrollee, or other person entitled to such benefits, whether provided by
an optometrist or physician, in instances where the services performed are within the
lawful scope of practice of both professions.
(2) Reimbursements or payments for covered services or covered materials
to the provider of such medical eye care or vision care services, whether performed
by an optometrist or physician, in instances where the services performed are within
the lawful scope of practice of both professions.
B. A duly licensed optometrist shall be entitled to participate in contracts or
plans providing for medical eye care or vision care services as a healthcare provider
or otherwise, to the same extent as a duly licensed physician, and there shall be no
discrimination against any provider, whether an optometrist or physician, who is
located within the geographic area of the health benefit plan, health maintenance
organization, preferred provider organization, managed care organization,
accountable care organization, vision benefit plan, vision benefit discount plan,
or other plan, agreement, or contract of insurance. A health maintenance
organization, preferred provider organization, managed care organization,
accountable care organization, vision benefit plan, vision benefit discount plan,
or other plan or contract of insurance, or any medical or hospital service contract
shall not impose a co-payment, co-insurance amount, or any other fee on a covered
participant or insured that is greater than the amount charged for the same service
when provided by an allopathic physician or an osteopathic physician.
C. It shall be unlawful for a health benefit plan, health maintenance
organization, preferred provider organization, managed care organization,
accountable care organization, vision benefit plan, vision benefit discount plan,
or other plan, agreement, or contract of insurance to require a duly licensed
optometrist to participate as a provider in another medical, or vision care plan, vision
Page 2 of 33
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 404 ENROLLED
benefit plan, or other plan, agreement, or contract as a condition of or requirement
for participation by such duly licensed optometrist as a provider in any medical or
vision care plan or contract.
D. The provisions, requirements, and prohibitions of this Section shall
apply equally to any agent acting on behalf of a health maintenance
organization, preferred provider organization, managed care organization,
accountable care organization, vision benefit plan, vision benefit discount plan,
or other plan or entity that offers an agreement or contract of insurance that
provides medical eye care or vision care benefits.
E. As used in this Section, the definitions provided for in R.S. 22:1809.4
shall apply.
* * *
PART XIII. VISION BENEFIT INSURANCE AND VISION DISCOUNT PLANS
§1809.1. Short title
This Part shall be cited as the "Louisiana Vision Plan Transparency and
Fair Practice Act".
§1809.2. Purpose
The purpose of this Part is to ensure patient access to eye care services
and materials through transparent and fair business practices by vision benefit
managers. Nothing in this Part shall be construed to expand or limit the scope
of practice of any licensed healthcare professional. The provisions of this Part
shall not apply to medical benefits provided by an insurer under a health benefit
plan that is not a vision benefit plan or vision benefit discount plan as defined
in this Part.
§1809.3. Legislative findings; access to eye care services
A. The legislature finds and declares that access to timely, affordable,
and appropriate eye care services is a matter of public health and patient safety
within this state.
B. The legislature further finds that:
(1) Vision benefit managers and vision benefit plans increasingly
Page 3 of 33
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 404 ENROLLED
influence where patients may obtain eye care services and materials, which
providers may participate in care delivery, and which treatments or materials
may be practically available to patients.
(2) Business practices that steer patients to affiliated providers, restrict
provider participation, limit access to independent laboratories or suppliers, or
interfere with clinical judgment may reduce access to care, particularly in rural
and underserved areas of this state.
(3) Independent eye care providers are essential to maintaining access
to vision and medical eye care services for Louisiana residents, including in
communities where alternative providers are limited or unavailable.
C. It is therefore the intent of the legislature that this Part be construed
and applied primarily to:
(1) Protect patient access to eye care services and materials.
(2) Preserve the integrity of the doctor-patient relationship.
(3) Ensure that clinical and prescriptive decisions remain under the
control of licensed healthcare professionals.
(4) Prevent practices that impair access to care through coercion,
steering, or anti-competitive conduct.
(5) Support a competitive healthcare environment that serves the health
needs of Louisiana residents.
D. The provisions of this Part are enacted pursuant to the state's
authority to regulate the professional delivery of healthcare services and to
protect public health, safety, and welfare.
§1809.4. Definitions
As used in this Part, the following definitions shall apply:
(1) "Chargeback" means a dollar amount, fee, surcharge, rebate, or item
of value that reduces, modifies, or offsets all or part of the patient responsibility,
provider reimbursement, allowed amount, or fee schedule for a covered service
or covered material.
(2) "Contractual discount" means a percentage reduction from a
Page 4 of 33
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 404 ENROLLED
provider's usual and customary rate for covered services and covered materials
required under a participating provider agreement.
(3) "Covered material" means a material for which reimbursement from
an insurer, vision benefit manager, or subcontractor is provided to an eye care
provider by an enrollee's plan contract, or for which a reimbursement would
be available but for the application of the enrollee's contractual limitations of
deductibles, copayments, or coinsurance, regardless of how the materials are
listed or described in an enrollee's benefit plan's definition of benefits.
(4) "Covered service" means the professional work performed by an eye
care provider for which reimbursement from an insurer, vision benefit
manager, or subcontractor is provided to an eye care provider by an enrollee's
plan contract, or for which a reimbursement would be available but for the
application of the enrollee's contractual plan limitations of deductibles,
copayments, or coinsurance, regardless of how the services are listed or
described in an enrollee's benefit plan's definition of benefits.
(5) "De minimis" means equal to zero or an otherwise negligible amount.
(6) "Enrollee" means any individual participating in a health benefit
plan, vision benefit plan, or vision benefit discount plan that is purchased by an
individual or provided to an individual by an insurer, company, organization,
group, employer, government assistance program, or any other entity that
purchases or supplies coverage for a health benefit plan, vision care benefit
plan, or vision benefit discount plan.
(7) "Eye care provider" means a licensed doctor of optometry practicing
under the authority of R.S. 37:1041 or a licensed medical or osteopathic doctor
as defined in R.S. 37:1262.
(8) "Fee schedule" means the document or system that lists the
predetermined payment rates or allowed amounts for covered services or
covered materials and determines how much eye care providers are reimbursed
by the insurer or vision benefit manager and how much patients are charged by
the insurer, vision benefit manager, or eye care provider.
Page 5 of 33
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 404 ENROLLED
(9) "Health benefit plan" means a policy, contract, or agreement offered
by an insurer, third party administrator, or subcontractor to an enrollee to pay
for, reimburse, discount, or offset healthcare costs.
(10) "Insurer" means an individual, corporation, partnership, company,
organization, group, health maintenance organization, captive, risk-retention
group, self-insurance group, optometric service and indemnity corporation, or
other entity, whether organized for profit or not-for-profit, whether foreign or
domestic, that conducts business in this state and that offers a vision benefit
plan or provides coverage for vision-related services or vision-related materials
to enrollees. An entity is considered an insurer for purposes of this Part
irrespective of any of the following:
(a) Its corporate form or category of licensure, if applicable, including
whether it is otherwise subject to insurance regulations or any other
regulations.
(b) Whether it, either directly or indirectly reimburses, indemnifies,
pays, or discounts the costs of vision services or vision materials.
(c) Whether it delegates, assigns, or contracts performance of any
function regulated by this Part to an affiliate, subsidiary, contractor,
intermediary, or network leasing entity.
(11) "Material" means an ophthalmic device including but not limited
to lenses, devices containing lenses, artificial intraocular lenses, ophthalmic
frames, and other lens mounting apparatus, prisms, lens treatments, and
coatings, contact lenses, low vision devices, vision therapy devices, and
prosthetic devices to correct, relieve, or treat defects or abnormal conditions of
the human eye or the ocular adnexa, or any material allowed to be utilized by
the Louisiana State Board of Optometry Examiners and the Louisiana
Optometry Practice Act.
(12) "Nominal" means, when there is no corresponding reimbursement
in the current year's published Physician Fee Schedule released annually by the
Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services or in the current year's published
Page 6 of 33
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 404 ENROLLED
state Medicaid fee schedule, an amount less than the reasonable compensation
to the vision care provider rendering the covered service or covered materials,
taking into account the provider's direct and indirect costs, including the actual
acquisition costs and actual pro rata overhead costs, and reasonable profit.
(13) "Optometrist" means a licensed doctor of optometry practicing
under the authority of R.S. 37:1041.
(14) "Participating eye care provider" means an eye care provider that
has entered into a contractual agreement or other business relationship with an
insurer, vision benefit manager, third-party administrator, or subcontractor to
provide covered services or covered materials.
(15) "Subcontractor" means an individual, company, organization,
group, or other entity, including but not limited to an agent, servant, broker,
wholesaler, distributor, partially-owned or wholly-owned subsidiary, or
controlled organization that is contracted by the vision benefit manager to
supply services or materials to another vision benefit manager, eye care
provider, or enrollee to execute or fulfill the health benefit plan, vision benefit
plan, or vision benefit discount plan of a vision benefit manager.
(16) "Third-party administrator" means an individual, company,
organization, group, or other entity that provides services, including but not
limited to administrative, operational, regulatory, human resource, compliance,
and claim adjudication services for an insurer, vision benefit manager,
individual, company, organization, group, or other entity under a contract or
agreement.
(17) "Vision benefit discount plan" means a policy, contract, or
agreement offered by an insurer or vision benefit manager to an enrollee that
solely provides for a discount for vision care services or materials.
(18) "Vision benefit plan" means a policy, contract, or agreement offered
by an insurer or vision benefit manager to an enrollee to pay for, reimburse, or
offset health and vision care costs.
(19) "Vision benefit manager" means an individual, company,
Page 7 of 33
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 404 ENROLLED
organization, group, or other entity, including but not limited to insurers, third-
party administrators, and subcontractors, that creates, promotes, sells,
provides, advertises, or administers an integrated or stand-alone vision benefit
plan, vision benefit discount plan, or other insurance policy or contract which
provides vision benefits or discounts to an enrollee pertaining to the provision
of covered services or covered materials.
§1809.5. Covered and noncovered services and materials
A. No contract or agreement between an insurer or vision benefit
manager and an eye care provider may seek to or require that an eye care
provider provide services or materials at a fee limited or set by the insurer or
vision benefit manager unless the services or materials are defined and
reimbursed as covered services or covered materials under the contract or
agreement.
B. An insurer or vision benefit manager shall use only standardized
codes, names, descriptions, and definitions published in the Healthcare
Common Procedure Coding System, including Current Procedural
Terminology codes published by the American Medical Association and Level
II codes published by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, to
identify and describe all covered services and covered materials of the vision
benefit plan to purchasers and enrollees of the vision benefit plan.
C. An insurer or vision benefit manager shall use only standardized
codes, names, descriptions, and definitions published in the Healthcare
Common Procedure Coding System, including all Current Procedural
Terminology codes published by the American Medical Association and all
Level II codes published by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services,
to create and offer a fee schedule of allowed amounts for covered services and
covered materials in a contract or agreement between the insurer or vision
benefit manager and an eye care provider.
D. An insurer or vision benefit manager shall not misuse, misrepresent,
or change the meaning of any of the standardized codes, names, descriptions,
Page 8 of 33
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 404 ENROLLED
and definitions published in the Healthcare Common Procedure Coding System,
including all Current Procedural Terminology codes published by the American
Medical Association and all Level II codes published by the Centers for
Medicare and Medicaid Services. Any such contractual language, policies, or
procedures set by the insurer or vision benefit manager in violation of the
foregoing shall be void and unenforceable.
E. All fee schedules in an agreement between an insurer or vision benefit
manager and an eye care provider and all reimbursements paid by an insurer
or vision benefit manager to an eye care provider for all covered services and
covered materials shall not be nominal or de minimis. There shall be no
limitation on the ability of an individual eye care provider or a group of eye
care providers who practice under a single Employer Identification Number or
Tax Identification Number to engage in direct negotiations with the insurer or
vision benefit manager regarding reimbursement fee schedules, and agreeing
to a different fee schedule than the fee schedule provided by the insurer or
vision benefit manager to other participating providers or groups.
F. All fee schedule allowed amounts and all reimbursements paid by an
insurer or vision benefit manager for each covered service and covered material
shall be clearly and individually listed on a fee schedule made available to the
eye care provider at all of the following times:
(1) At the time a contract or agreement is offered to the eye care
provider by an insurer or vision benefit manager.
(2) Within ten business days from the date an application is made to
become a participating eye care provider with the insurer or vision benefit
manager by the eye care provider.
(3) At all times via electronic means.
G. A contract or agreement between an insurer or vision benefit
manager and an eye care provider shall include a fee schedule that includes and
individually identifies each covered service and covered material and its
corresponding allowed amount, reimbursement amount paid to the eye care
Page 9 of 33
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 404 ENROLLED
provider, and any form of a cost-sharing amount paid by the enrollee to the eye
care provider.
H. Insurers or vision benefit managers shall not advertise, claim, or
represent to purchasers or enrollees that services and materials provided by a
participating eye care provider are covered or included, or covered or included
with an additional deductible, copay, or coinsurance, if the insurer or vision
benefit manager does not remit an actual payment to the participating eye care
provider as full or partial reimbursement for the service or material.
I. A service or material provided by a participating eye care provider
shall not be designated as a covered service or covered material by the insurer
or vision benefit manager in the design of a health benefit plan or vision benefit
plan if the reimbursement amount to the participating eye care provider is only
comprised of an enrollee's payment to the participating eye care provider.
J. Insurers or vision benefit managers shall not condition application to
a network or participation in a health benefit plan, vision benefit plan, or vision
benefit discount plan by an eye care provider based on the eye care provider's
usual and customary pricing or discounts on usual and customary pricing for
services or materials that are not covered services or not covered materials. Any
such contractual language, policies, or procedures set by the insurer or vision
benefit manager in violation of the foregoing shall be void and unenforceable.
K. An insurer or vision benefit manager shall not make conditional a fee
schedule proposed or made to an eye care provider of a health benefit plan,
vision benefit plan, or vision benefit discount plan for covered services or
covered materials based on the eye care provider's usual and customary pricing
or discounts on usual and customary pricing for services or materials that are
not covered services or not covered materials. Any such contractual language,
policies, or procedures set by the insurer or vision benefit manager in violation
of the foregoing shall be void and unenforceable.
L. A contract or agreement between an insurer or vision benefit manager
and an eye care provider shall not contain a provision, fee schedule, or
Page 10 of 33
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 404 ENROLLED
reimbursement amount requiring the eye care provider, taking into account any
applicable deductibles, copays, coinsurances, discounts, rebates, or chargebacks,
to provide covered services or covered materials to an enrollee at a financial
loss. Any such contractual language, policies, or procedures set by the insurer
or vision benefit manager in violation of the foregoing shall be void and
unenforceable.
M. All fee schedule-allowed amounts in a provider agreement between
an insurer or vision benefit manager and an eye care provider for all covered
services and covered materials shall not be less than the current year's
published Physician Fee Schedule released annually by the Centers for
Medicare and Medicaid Services, unless either of the following occurs:
(1) In the event that a covered service or covered material does not have
an allowed amount listed or if the allowed amount is listed at zero in the current
year's published Physician Fee Schedule released annually by the Centers for
Medicare and Medicaid Services, the allowed amount for the covered service or
covered material shall not be less than the current year's published state
Medicaid fee schedule rate.
(2) In the event that a covered service or covered material does not have
an allowed amount listed or if the allowed amount is listed at zero in the current
year's published Physician Fee Schedule released annually by the Centers for
Medicare and Medicaid Services or in the current year's published state
Medicaid fee schedule rate, the allowed amount for the covered service or
covered material shall be reasonable, and not nominal or de minimis.
N. The period of time prescribed by a contract or agreement between an
insurer or vision benefit manager and an eye care provider for the insurer or
vision benefit manager to recover any reimbursement amount from an eye care
provider shall be the same period of time allowed or required for any insurer
or vision benefit manager to remit the applicable reimbursement following an
eye care provider's submission of a clean claim for services rendered or
materials furnished. The foregoing shall not limit an insurer or vision benefit
Page 11 of 33
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 404 ENROLLED
manager's ability to conduct an audit of claims, in accordance with the insurer
or vision benefit plan manager's written policies and applicable law, in the event
that the insurer or vision benefit manager has a reasonable belief that the eye
care provider has engaged in fraud, waste, or abuse.
O. An insurer or vision benefit manager shall not falsely represent the
number of participating providers in a region nor the benefits that comprise a
health benefit plan, vision benefit plan, or vision benefit discount plan to clients,
groups, employers, purchasers, companies, enrollees, or prospective enrollees.
Such acts are considered deceptive trade practices and subject to penalty under
R.S. 22:1964.
P. An insurer or vision benefit manager shall not promote or use in any
marketing or advertising that a covered service or covered material is "free",
"no charge", or "complimentary" or any materially similar language to a
client, group, employer, purchaser, company, enrollee, or prospective enrollee
to purchase services, materials, supplies, or plans from the insurer, vision
benefit manager, or affiliate of the insurer or vision benefit manager.
Q. An insurer or vision benefit manager shall not offer enrollees varying
deductibles, copays, coinsurances, coverage amounts, rebates, gift cards, or
other monetary or nonmonetary incentives to obtain covered services, covered
materials, noncovered services, or noncovered materials at any of the following:
(1) At any particular participating eye care provider.
(2) At a retail establishment owned by, partially owned by, contracted
with, or otherwise affiliated with the insurer or vision benefit manager.
(3) At any internet or virtual provider or retailer owned by, partially
owned by, contracted with, or otherwise affiliated with the insurer or vision
benefit manager.
R. An insurer or vision benefit manager shall not engage in marketing
or advertising activities that may be misleading or deceptive to the public. Upon
request by a jurisdictional enforcement agency, insurers and vision benefit
managers shall submit all information regarding alleged savings and discounts
Page 12 of 33
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 404 ENROLLED
offered by affiliates of the insurer or vision benefit manager.
S. An insurer or vision benefit manager shall remit to the participating
eye care provider the contracted reimbursement amount for a covered service
or covered material provided to an enrollee if the enrollee is verified to be
eligible by the participating eye care provider through customary verification
methods of the insurer or vision benefit manager to receive the covered service
or covered material on the date of service.
T. A participating eye care provider is allowed, but not required, to offer
an enrollee the opportunity to pay the participating eye care provider directly
for covered services and covered materials if such direct payment would be less
costly to the enrollee than the total out-of-pocket cost required under the terms
of a health benefit plan or vision benefit plan. An eye care provider may not be
subject to an audit, removed from participation in the network, or otherwise
penalized or discriminated against in any manner for offering an enrollee the
opportunity to pay the participating provider directly under the conditions of
this Subsection.
U. An insurer or vision benefit manager shall not retroactively reverse
a reimbursement or withhold a future reimbursement to an eye care provider
who relied in good faith on an individual's presented coverage credentials and
the customary verification methods of the insurer or vision benefits manager,
if the insurer or vision benefit manager later determines that the enrollee was
ineligible to receive covered services or covered materials on the date of service.
V. An insurer or vision benefit manager shall not require a participating
eye care provider, purchaser, or enrollee of a health benefit plan, vision benefit
plan, or vision benefit discount plan to obtain prior authorization,
preauthorization, precertification, or any similar mechanism that restricts the
enrollee from receiving a covered service or covered material recommended by
the eye care provider and requested by the enrollee.
W.(1) An insurer or vision benefit manager shall not, in the course of
adjudicating a claim for reimbursement by a participating eye care provider for
Page 13 of 33
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 404 ENROLLED
a covered service or covered material, alter, delete, substitute, or otherwise
change any code or modifier submitted by the eye care provider, including
downcoding, bundling, or reassigning to a different code, if such change would
reduce payment or otherwise adversely affect the provider or enrollee.
(2) For purposes of this Subsection, the following definitions apply:
(a) "Bundling" means to combine, substitute, or treat two or more
distinct services, supplies, or materials reported on the same claim, date, or
service as included within a single code, package, or global service, and denying,
reducing, or disallowing separate reimbursement for one or more of the codes.
(b) "Downcoding" means to alter, delete, substitute, or assign a code that
results in a lower level of service, a lower-valued code, or a reduced
reimbursement amount relative to the code submitted by the eye care provider.
X. The provisions of this Section shall apply to any affiliate or
subcontractor that is used by an insurer or vision benefit manager to supply
covered services or covered materials to an eye care provider or enrollee and
be subject to all applicable penalties as provided for in this Part.
Y. An insurer or vision benefit manager shall neither require nor request
an eye care provider to opt-in or opt-out of the provisions set forth in this
Section.
§1809.6. Credentialing; forced participation in panel prohibition; payment
parity
A. No contract or agreement between an insurer or vision benefit
manager and an eye care provider shall require an eye care provider to
participate with, be credentialed by, or enter into a contract or agreement with
any specific vision benefit plan or vision benefit discount plan as a condition for
participation in the health benefit plan provider network of the insurer or vision
benefit manager to provide covered services to the enrollees of the health benefit
plan.
B. Any insurer or vision benefit manager issuing or renewing a health
benefit plan, vision benefit plan, or vision benefit discount plan, which provides
Page 14 of 33
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 404 ENROLLED
benefits for covered services or covered materials rendered by a medical doctor
or an osteopathic doctor that is within the scope of practice of an optometrist,
shall provide no less than the same reimbursement for covered services or
covered materials to optometrists as allowed for those covered services or
covered materials rendered by medical doctors or osteopathic doctors.
C. An insurer or vision benefit manager shall apply the same terms and
conditions of participation for all eye care providers irrespective of their
educational credentials, subject to the permitted scope of practice for the
licensee under applicable state law.
D. An insurer or vision benefit manager shall not require an eye care
provider to possess, offer, or sell materials or covered materials in their office
as a condition of participation in the provider network of health benefit plan,
vision benefit plan, or vision benefit discount plan. Any such contractual
language, policies, or procedures set by the insurer or vision benefit manager
in violation of the foregoing shall be void and unenforceable.
E. If an eye care provider enters into any subcontract agreement with
another provider to provide licensed healthcare services to an enrollee or a
covered dependent of an enrollee of a health benefit plan, vision benefit plan,
or vision benefit discount plan where the subcontracted provider seeks
reimbursement from the plan, or enrollee for the subcontracted services, the
subcontract agreement must meet all requirements of this Section.
F. The provisions of this Section shall apply to any contract or agreement
an insurer or vision benefit manager enters into with another entity to provide
an enrollee with covered services or covered materials.
§1809.7. Unfair trade practices
A. It is prohibited for an insurer or vision benefit manager that offers
multiple health benefit plans, vision benefit plans, or vision benefit discount
plans to require an eye care provider, as a condition of participation in the
network for a health benefit plan, vision benefit plan, or vision benefit discount
plan, to participate in the network of any of the insurer's or vision benefit
Page 15 of 33
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 404 ENROLLED
manager's other health benefit plans, vision benefit plans, or vision benefit
discount plans. A contract provision or agreement violating this Subsection
shall be void. The penalties and remedies provided for violation of provisions
of this Part shall not waive, limit, or otherwise affect the applicability of the
Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Law, R.S. 51:1401 et seq., or
any other law providing for civil or criminal penalties or remedies for unfair,
deceptive, or unlawful business practices.
B. It is prohibited for an insurer or vision benefit manager that offers
multiple health benefit plans, vision benefit plans, or vision benefit discount
plans to withhold participation in the network of one or more of the insurer's
or vision benefit manager's other health benefit plans, vision benefit plans, or
vision benefit discount plans if the eye care provider is already participating in
the network of one or more of the insurer's or vision benefit manager's health
benefit plans, vision benefit plans, or vision benefit discount plans and seeks to
participate in the network of the insurer's or vision benefit manager's other
health benefit plans, vision benefit plans, or vision benefit discount plans.
C. This Section applies to all plan types that a health benefit plan, vision
benefit plan, or vision benefit discount plan sells, administers, or offers,
including but not limited to individually purchased plans and
employer-sponsored plans.
§1809.8. Credentialing and contracting requirements; acceptance as
participating eye care provider
A. An insurer or vision benefit manager shall include all of the following
on its website:
(1) A method for an eye care provider to submit an application for
inclusion and credentialing as a participating provider in the health benefit
plan, vision benefit plan, or vision benefit discount plan.
(2) A description of the credentialing requirements, which shall be
reasonable, related to the delivery of covered eye care services, and applied in
an objective, uniform, and nondiscriminatory manner.
Page 16 of 33
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 404 ENROLLED
B. An insurer's or vision benefit manager's application for inclusion and
credentialing as a participating eye care provider in the health benefit plan,
vision benefit plan, or vision benefit discount plan shall only require
standardized information specified in the current version of the Louisiana
Standardized Credentialing Application Form or the current format used by
the Council for Affordable Quality Healthcare credentialing application.
C. An insurer's or vision benefit manager's application for inclusion and
credentialing as a participating eye care provider in the health insurance benefit
plan, vision benefit plan, or vision benefit discount plan shall impose the same
application requirements on each eye care provider.
D. Not later than the thirtieth business day after the date the insurer or
vision benefit manager receives an application from an eye care provider for
inclusion as a participating provider in the health benefit plan, vision benefit
plan, or vision benefit discount plan, the insurer or vision benefit manager shall
inform the applicant of all defects and reasons known at the time by the insurer
or vision benefit manager in the event that the application is deemed to be not
correctly completed.
E. Not later than the fortieth business day after the date the insurer or
vision benefit manager receives an application from an eye care provider for
inclusion as a participating provider in the health benefit plan, vision benefit,
or vision benefit discount planning, the insurer or vision benefit manager shall
make available electronically to the eye care provider the proposed
participating provider contract, including applicable fee schedules, provider
handbooks, and provider manuals.
F. Not later than the ninetieth business day after the date the insurer or
vision benefit manager receives an application from an eye care provider for
inclusion as a participating provider in the health benefit plan, vision benefit
plan, or vision benefit discount plan, the insurer or vision benefit manager shall
complete the credentialing determination of the eye care provider, approve or
disapprove the application of the eye care provider, and deliver electronically
Page 17 of 33
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 404 ENROLLED
a proposed participating provider contract as provided for in this Section for
acceptance and signature to the approved eye care provider.
G. If the application for inclusion and credentialing as a participating
provider is denied by the insurer or vision benefit manager, the insurer or
vision benefit manager shall deliver to the applicant a detailed explanation for
the denial, both electronically and in writing via certified mail.
H. If the application for inclusion and credentialing as a participating
provider is denied by the insurer or vision benefit manager, the eye care
provider shall be allowed a reasonable period of time in which to appeal the
decision to the insurer or vision benefit manager and provide in the appeal
evidence that supports the reconsideration of the denied application. The
insurer or vision benefit managers shall consider, and render a decision on the
eye care provider's appeal submission within thirty days of the date of receipt
of the submission by the insurer or vision benefit manager.
I. If the appeal to the application denial for inclusion and credentialing
as a participating provider is denied by the insurer or vision benefit manager,
the insurer or vision benefit manager shall deliver to the applicant a detailed
explanation for the denial of the appeal, both electronically and in writing via
certified mail.
J. If the appeal to the application denial for inclusion and credentialing
as a participating provider is denied by the insurer or vision benefit manager,
the applicant may appeal the decision to the commissioner and seek a ruling
that allows the eye care provider to become a participating provider in the
health benefit plan, vision benefit plan, or vision benefit discount plan.
K. An insurer or vision benefit manager, concurrent with the electronic
delivery of the proposed participating provider contract to the approved eye
care provider, shall provide the name, email address, and phone number of the
representative of the insurer or vision benefit manager to allow the approved
eye care provider the opportunity to do all of the following:
(1) Contact the representative before signing the contract or agreement.
Page 18 of 33
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 404 ENROLLED
(2) Discuss the proposed contract with the representative before signing
the contract or agreement.
(3) Electronically send the representative modifications to the proposed
contract or agreement before signing the contract.
L. In the event that the approved eye care provider sends the
representative of the insurer or vision benefit manager modifications to the
proposed participating provider contract, the insurer or vision benefit manager
shall respond to the submission of the approved eye care provider within five
business days. Each subsequent response made by the insurer, vision benefit
manager, or approved eye care provider to the other party shall be responded
to within five business days by the receiving party.
M. Once the insurer or vision benefit manager has approved and
delivered electronically a proposed participating provider contract, the
approved eye care provider has a total allotted time frame of ninety business
days to reach agreement with the insurer or vision benefit manager and sign a
participating provider contract or agreement. If the parties fail to reach an
agreement and no participating provider contract is signed by the approved eye
care provider within the allotted time frame, the insurer or vision benefit
manager may retract the participating provider's contract or agreement.
N. Not later than the twentieth business day after the date the approved
eye care provider signs a participating provider contract, the insurer or vision
benefit manager shall include the credentialed and approved eye care provider
as a participating provider in the health benefit plan, vision benefit plan, or
vision benefit discount plan, and list the eye care provider without limitation in
all of the plan directories that are available to enrollees and the public.
O. The earliest that an eye care provider may submit another application
to an insurer or vision benefit manager, after a previous approval and
subsequent unsuccessful attempt to sign a participating provider contract, is
one hundred eighty calendar days from the date of the previous application.
P. The earliest that an eye care provider may submit another application
Page 19 of 33
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 404 ENROLLED
to an insurer or vision benefit manager after a previous disapproval of an
application is one hundred eighty calendar days from the date of the previous
application.
Q. An insurer or vision benefit manager shall allow an eye care provider
to become a participating provider in the network of a health benefit plan,
vision benefit plan, or vision benefit discount plan if the eye care provider does
all of the following:
(1) Meets the credentialing requirements of the insurer or vision benefit
manager.
(2) Agrees in writing to the applicable provider agreement.
R. An insurer or vision benefit manager shall allow all eye care providers
who practice under a single Employer Identification Number or Tax
Identification Number to become participating providers in the network of a
health benefit plan, vision benefit plan, or vision benefit discount plan if one eye
care provider practicing in that practice does all of the following:
(1) Meets the credentialing requirements of the insurer or vision benefit
manager.
(2) Agrees in writing to the applicable provider agreement.
S. An insurer or vision benefit manager shall not exclude an eye care
provider from applying to or becoming a participating provider in the network
of a health benefit plan, vision benefit plan, or vision benefit discount plan
because of any of the following:
(1) The aggregate number of eye care providers in a state, county, city,
zip code, or other geographically defined service area.
(2) The time, distance, or appointment availability for an enrollee to
access a participating eye care provider.
(3) The eye care provider's professional designation, independent
practice affiliation, or participation status in other health benefit plans, vision
benefit plans, or vision benefit discount plans.
T. An insurer or vision benefit manager shall not deny participation to
Page 20 of 33
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 404 ENROLLED
any eye care provider employed by or under contract with a federally qualified
health center or rural health clinic, based on the practice setting, ownership
structure, participation through the federally qualified health center or rural
health clinic, or designation as a federally qualified health center or rural health
clinic.
§1809.9. Transparency and disclosure requirements for insurers and vision
benefit managers
A. An insurer or vision benefit manager shall disclose all of the following
information publicly on its internet website and with all documents and
document packages, including but not limited to proposals, responses to
requests for proposals, sales documents, enrollment documents, benefit plan
documents, purchaser contracts, enrollee contracts, and provider agreements
that are presented to purchasers, potential purchasers, enrollees, potential
enrollees, participating eye care providers, potential participating providers,
and state agencies with jurisdictional, regulatory, or enforcement authority over
its business:
(1) Its legal name and entity type.
(2) Its legal address and state in which the legal entity is formed or
organized.
(3) The physical address, mailing address, electronic mail address, and
phone number of its operational headquarters.
(4) The agencies, departments, committees, commissions, and other
bodies that have jurisdictional, regulatory, or enforcement authority over the
business.
(5) A statement that no jurisdictional, regulatory, or enforcement
authority exists over its business, if none exists.
(6) The names, physical addresses, mailing addresses, electronic mail
addresses, and phone numbers of all parent companies, related holding
companies, wholly-owned subsidiary companies, and partially-owned subsidiary
companies.
Page 21 of 33
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 404 ENROLLED
(7) All federal and state litigation in which the company is, or has been,
a party to in the current year and during the preceding five years.
(8) All Department of Insurance formal complaints against the company
in the current year and during the preceding five years by purchasers, enrollees,
or eye care providers.
B. All information required to be disclosed by an insurer or vision
benefit manager in Subsection A of this Section shall be conveyed in plain
language and typed with a minimum of ten point font size and prominently
displayed in all of the following:
(1) On the insurer's or vision benefit manager's website in a publicly
accessible section titled "Required Transparency Information for Patients,
Doctors, and Purchasers".
(2) In a separately created document titled "Required Transparency
Information for Patients, Doctors, and Purchasers" that shall be included with
all documents and document packages, including but not limited to proposals,
responses to requests for proposals, benefit plan documents, sales documents,
enrollment documents, purchaser contracts, enrollee contracts, and provider
agreements.
C. An insurer or vision benefit manager shall provide notice to each
participating eye care provider of any proposed amendments to existing
provider agreements, fee schedules, provider handbooks, provider manuals, or
related policy documents via electronic mail.
D. A participating eye care provider shall be provided with a minimum
of ninety calendar days from the time of distribution to review changes and
respond, if necessary, to any proposed amendments from an insurer or vision
benefit manager to existing provider agreements, fee schedules, provider
handbooks, provider manuals, or related policy documents. Any such proposed
amendments proffered by the insurer or vision benefit manager in violation of
the foregoing shall be void and unenforceable.
E. Any proposed amendments to existing provider agreements, fee
Page 22 of 33
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 404 ENROLLED
schedules, provider handbooks, provider manuals, or related policy documents
by an insurer or vision benefit manager delivered to a participating eye care
provider shall be all of the following:
(1) Enumerated in a cover letter.
(2) Marked with highlights or as tracked changes within the applicable
agreements or documents, to clearly display all changes over any of the previous
version.
(3) Structured to include implications of agreement or nonagreement by
the participating eye care provider.
F. An insurer or vision benefit manager shall maintain all of the
following:
(1) A phone number for company representatives to receive questions
and communications from participating eye care providers at all times during
standard business hours.
(2) The ability for an eye care provider to leave voice messages at all
times.
(3) The ability for an eye care provider to have a live phone discussion
with a company representative within twenty-four hours of an initial phone call
or a voice message left with the insurer or vision benefit manager.
G. An insurer or vision benefit manager shall maintain a physical
mailing address and an electronic mail address to company representatives to
receive questions, disputes, and communications from participating eye care
providers about all matters, at all times, including but not limited to proposed
amendments to existing provider agreements, fee schedules, provider
handbooks, provider manuals, and related policy documents, and will publish
instructions for mail submission and electronic mail submission of questions,
disputes, and communications in a place visible to participating eye care
providers including on its website and in any provider agreements, provider
handbooks, provider manuals, or related policy documents.
H. An insurer or vision benefit manager shall acknowledge receipt of an
Page 23 of 33
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 404 ENROLLED
electronic mail message within one hour by use of a return electronic mail
message with a communication tracking number and shall respond to the
substantive questions or communications of the electronic mail message within
seventy-two hours in writing by use of a return electronic mail message.
I. An insurer or vision benefit manager shall, at all times, make available
to the eye care provider the most up-to-date provider agreements, fee schedules,
provider handbooks, provider manuals, and related policy documents via
website access.
J. Insurers or vision benefit managers shall not engage in marketing or
advertising activities that are misleading or deceptive to the public. Such acts
are considered an unfair practice or act in accordance with the Unfair Trade
Practices and Consumer Protection Law, R.S. 51:1401 et seq.
K. Upon request by a state agency with jurisdictional, regulatory, or
enforcement authority over its business, insurers and vision benefit managers
shall submit all information related to a health benefit plan, vision benefit plan,
or vision benefit discount plan, including but not limited to proposals, responses
to requests for proposals, benefit plan documents, sales documents, enrollment
documents, purchaser contracts, enrollee contracts, provider agreements, and
marketing and advertising activities for review.
§1809.10. Amending agreements; contracts; payment methods; security
interests; arbitration expenses
A. An insurer or vision benefit manager shall not change or alter a
contract or agreement, including terms, reimbursements, or fee schedules,
entered into with a participating eye care provider unless the insurer or vision
benefit manager complies with all of the following requirements at least ninety
days before the date of the proposed change would take effect:
(1) A certified letter, or an electronic communication requiring an
electronic signature proving receipt, detailing proposed changes is required to
be sent to the eye care provider.
(2) A face-to-face or virtual meeting is required to discuss proposed
Page 24 of 33
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 404 ENROLLED
changes, if requested by the eye care provider.
(3) The eye care provider shall either agree or not agree in writing to
proposed changes. If the changes in the contract or agreement are not agreed
to by the eye care provider then the current agreement shall continue and the
insurer or vision benefit manager may not remove the eye care provider from
a network panel or plan for not accepting the proposed changes to a contract
or agreement.
(4) A new agreement is required to be established and agreed upon after
three or more material changes, are made to an existing agreement between an
eye care provider and an insurer or vision benefit manager.
(5) Any proposed amendment to an existing contract or agreement shall
be presented to the participating eye care provider in a manner conducive to the
provider's review. Proposed changes will be enumerated in a cover letter and
clearly marked as tracked changes within the body of the applicable contract
or agreement.
B. A contract or agreement between an insurer or vision benefit manager
and an eye care provider shall not contain any provision requiring an
optometrist to accept a reimbursement payment in the form of a virtual credit
card or any other payment method wherein a processing fee, administrative fee,
percentage amount, or dollar amount is assessed for the provider to receive the
reimbursement payment.
C. Termination of any contract or agreement shall be permissible only
in the event of a material breach, wherein the eye care provider fails to remedy
the alleged breach to the reasonable satisfaction of the insurer or vision benefit
manager within thirty days of receipt of written notice specifying the alleged
breach.
D. It shall be prohibited for an insurer or vision benefit manager to
require an eye care provider to establish a security interest in all or part of their
property and assets, including assets pertaining to their practice, in a sum
equivalent to the funds owed to the insurer or vision benefit manager at
Page 25 of 33
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 404 ENROLLED
termination. Any such contractual language, policies, or procedures set by the
insurer or vision benefit manager in violation of the foregoing shall be void and
unenforceable.
E. A contract or agreement between an insurer or vision benefit manager
and an eye care provider shall not contain a provision obligating the eye care
provider to equally share the expenses of arbitration. Each party shall bear
their own arbitration costs, contingent upon a fee-shifting provision that grants
prevailing party status.
F. An insurer or vision benefit manager shall not retaliate in any manner
against an eye care provider for discussing, or attempting in good faith to
negotiate, the terms and provisions of a provider agreement with the insurer or
vision benefit manager.
G. An insurer or vision benefit manager shall not retaliate in any manner
against an eye care provider for filing a complaint against the insurer or vision
benefit manager with any state agency with jurisdictional, regulatory, or
enforcement authority over the business of the insurer or vision benefit
manager.
H. Should retaliation by an insurer or vision benefit manager occur
against an eye care provider in violation of Subsections F or G of this Section,
the commissioner may sanction the insurer or vision benefit manager, including
fines and other remedies deemed appropriate, and provide an appropriate
remedy for the aggrieved eye care provider.
§1809.11. Optical labs and suppliers
A. No contract or agreement between an insurer or vision benefit
manager and an eye care provider shall restrict or limit, either directly or
indirectly, the eye care provider's choice or use of sources and suppliers of
covered or uncovered services or materials, including the choice or use of
optical laboratories, provided by the eye care provider to an enrollee. Any such
contractual language, policies, or procedures set by the insurer or vision benefit
manager in violation of the foregoing shall be void and unenforceable.
Page 26 of 33
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 404 ENROLLED
B. An insurer or vision benefit manager shall not directly or indirectly
do any of the following:
(1) Control or attempt to control the professional judgment, manner of
practice, or practice of an eye care provider.
(2) Employ an eye care provider to provide a covered service or covered
material.
(3) Withhold or recoup payment to an eye care provider for covered
services or covered materials provided for an enrollee if the enrollee was shown
to be eligible on the date that the covered services or covered materials were
provided.
(4) Reimburse an eye care provider a different amount for covered
services or covered materials because of the eye care provider's choice of any
of the following:
(a) Optical laboratory.
(b) Source of supplier of any of the following:
(i) Contact lenses.
(ii) Ophthalmic lenses.
(iii) Ophthalmic glasses frames.
(iv) Covered or non-covered services or materials.
(c) Equipment used for patient care.
(d) Retail optical affiliation.
(e) Vision support organization.
(f) Group purchasing organization.
(g) Doctor alliance or group.
(h) Professional trade association membership.
(i) Electronic health record software, electronic medical record software,
or practice management software.
(j) Third-party claim filing service, billing service, or electronic data
interchange clearinghouse company.
(5) Restrict, limit, or influence an eye care provider's choice of sources
Page 27 of 33
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 404 ENROLLED
or suppliers of services or materials, including optical laboratories used by the
eye care provider to provide services or materials to the enrollee.
(6) Restrict, limit, or influence an eye care provider's choice of electronic
health record software, electronic medical record software, or practice
management software.
(7) Restrict, limit, or influence an eye care provider's choice of
third-party claim filing service, billing service, or electronic data interchange
clearinghouse company.
(8) Restrict or limit an eye care provider's access to an enrollee's
complete plan coverage information, including in-network and out-of-network
coverage details.
(9) Apply a chargeback to an enrollee or eye care provider if the
chargeback is for a covered product or service for which the insurer or vision
benefit manager does not incur the cost to produce, deliver, or provide to the
enrollee or eye care provider.
(10) Require an eye care provider to disclose an enrollee's confidential
or protected health information unless the disclosure is expressly authorized by
the enrollee, or permitted without authorization under the Health Insurance
Portability and Accountability Act of 1996.
(11) Require an eye care provider to disclose or report a medical history
or diagnosis as a condition to file a claim, adjudicate a claim, or receive
reimbursement for a routine or wellness eye exam.
(12) Require an eye care provider to disclose or report an enrollee's
glasses prescription, contact lens prescription, ophthalmic device
measurements, facial photograph, or unique anatomical measurements as
condition to file a claim, adjudicate a claim, or receive reimbursement for a
claim, unless the information is needed for the vision benefit manager to
manufacture, or cause to be manufactured, a covered product that is submitted
on the applicable claim.
(13) Require an eye care provider to disclose any enrollee information,
Page 28 of 33
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 404 ENROLLED
other than information identified on the version of the Health Insurance Claim
Form approved by the National Uniform Claim Committee as of March 1, 2023,
or its approved successor, as a condition to file a claim, adjudicate a claim, or
receive reimbursement for a claim unless the information is needed for the
vision benefit manager to manufacture, or cause to be manufactured, a covered
product that is submitted on the applicable claim.
C. An insurer or vision benefit manager shall not solicit patients or
referrals for supplies on behalf of itself or its affiliates by identifying
participating eye care providers in an inaccurate or otherwise misleading
manner, in any list of participating providers, or in any communications to
purchasers or enrollees. All communications which distinguish between
participating eye care providers, or which otherwise claim professional
superiority or the performance of a professional service in a superior manner,
based on any of the following characteristics, shall be readily subject to
verification by the Department of Insurance:
(1) A discount or incentive offered by the participating eye care provider
on services and materials that are not covered by the insurer or vision benefit
manager.
(2) The dollar amount, volume amount, or percent usage amount of any
material, product, or good purchased by the participating eye care provider.
(3) The brand, source, manufacturer, or supplier of a covered service or
covered material utilized by the participating eye care provider.
D. This Section shall not prohibit advertising, provided that such
advertising is not false, misleading, or deceptive and is readily subject to
verification.
§1809.12. Extrapolation prohibited
A. An insurer or vision benefit manager shall not use extrapolation to
complete an audit of a participating eye care provider. Any additional payment
due to a participating eye care provider or any refund due to the insurer or
vision benefit manager shall not be based on an extrapolation, but shall be
Page 29 of 33
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 404 ENROLLED
based on the actual overpayment or underpayment, as determined after an
investigation by the insurer or vision benefit manager, and participating eye
care provider has been afforded, and has exhausted, all opportunities to appeal
the insurer or vision benefit manager's findings, as set forth in the provider
manual, policy document, or applicable law.
B. For purposes of this Section, "extrapolation" means a mathematical
formula, process, or technique used by a vision benefit manager, or the vision
benefit manager's agent, in the audit of an optometrist to estimate audit results
or findings for a larger batch or group of claims not reviewed by the vision
benefit manager.
§1809.13. Private right of action; eye care providers
Any eye care provider adversely affected by a violation of this Part may
bring an action in a court of competent jurisdiction for injunctive relief against
the insurer or vision benefit manager and, upon prevailing, in addition to such
injunctive relief, shall recover monetary damages, including but not limited to
direct, indirect, special, and punitive damages and penalties, of no more than
ten thousand dollars for each violation, plus attorney fees and costs.
§1809.14. Relationship to other laws
The requirements of this Part are in addition to, and do not limit, any
other requirement applicable to an insurer under state law. In the event of a
conflict between this Part and another provision of law applicable to insurers,
the provision that affords greater protection to eye care providers or plan
enrollees shall control. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, including
any law that purports to be the sole body of law governing the insurer, an
insurer shall comply with this Part, to the extent not preempted by federal law.
§1809.15. Authorization for enforcement
A. The Department of Insurance has jurisdiction to administer and
enforce this Part with respect to any insurer or vision benefit manager. The
department may do any of the following:
(1) Bring an action, issue orders, and impose remedies authorized by this
Page 30 of 33
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 404 ENROLLED
Part against any insurer or vision benefit manager.
(2) Adopt rules to identify activities that constitute the administration,
management, or control of vision benefits or materials.
(3) Coordinate enforcement with other state agencies that regulate
insurers under other applicable law. The attorney general shall have concurrent
enforcement authority for violations constituting unfair or deceptive acts or
practices.
B. The Department of Insurance shall do all of the following:
(1) Provide a mechanism for aggrieved individuals, whether actively or
formerly enrolled with a particular vision care plan, to submit complaints to the
department for review, investigation, and as appropriate, discipline under
applicable law.
(2) Enforce the state's insurance laws and the provisions of this Part
using powers granted to the commissioner in this Title.
(3) Ensure that insurers and vision benefit managers comply with the
requirements of this Part.
(4) Be entitled to seek an injunction against an insurer or vision benefit
manager in a court of competent jurisdiction if the insurer or vision benefit
manager does any of the following:
(a) Issues a coverage policy that does not comply with the requirements
of this Part, uses fraudulent, coercive, or dishonest practices, or demonstrates
incompetence, untrustworthiness, or financial irresponsibility in the conduct of
business.
(b) Fails to deal equitably with any eye care provider or other persons
or facilities which offer services or materials covered within an agreement or
contractor policy issued pursuant to this Part.
(c) Fails to substantially comply with the insurance laws of this state or
violates any regulation, rule, subpoena, or order of the commissioner.
C. The attorney general shall do all of the following:
(1) Enforce the provisions of this Part concerning discount card plans,
Page 31 of 33
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 404 ENROLLED
using powers granted to the attorney general pursuant to this Title and the
Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Law, R.S. 51:1401, et seq.
(2) Be entitled to seek an injunction against an insurer or vision benefit
manager in a court of competent jurisdiction.
§1809.16. Enactment provisions
A. The requirements of this Part shall apply to insurer or vision benefit
manager policies, agreements, contracts, addenda, and certificates executed,
delivered, issued for delivery, continued, or renewed in the state of Louisiana.
B. No insurer or vision benefit manager agreement may be longer than
two years from the date that it was signed by both parties.
C. No insurer or vision benefit manager shall construe re-credentialing
as re-contracting with a participating eye care provider. A provider contract or
agreement shall be a distinctly separate document from any credentialing
materials and shall be signed by the eye care provider and the insurer or vision
benefit manager.
D. An insurer or vision benefit manager shall include a copy of the
current plan provider manual referred to in a provider contract or agreement
at the time a contract or agreement is sent to any provider and prospective
provider, as well as any policies referenced in the contract or agreement.
Section 2. The provisions of this Act shall apply to all insurers and vision benefit
managers upon the earlier of:
(A) The renewal of enrollee's current benefit plan or upon issue of a new benefit plan
to any enrollee.
(B) The initiation of a new contract or agreement with an eye care provider or upon
any modification of an existing contract or agreement with an eye care provider.
(C) January 1, 2027.
Section 3. If any provision or item of this Act, or the application thereof, is held
invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions, items, or applications of the Act
which can be given effect without the invalid provision, item, or application and to this end
the provisions of this Act are hereby declared severable.
Page 32 of 33
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 404 ENROLLED
Section 4. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 33 of 33
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.